New Jersey, session 221, A1530.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A taxpayer whose gross income for the taxable year does not exceed $260,000 shall be allowed a credit against the tax due pursuant to the New Jersey Gross Income Tax Act, N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq., in an amount equal to the value of qualified homeschooling expenses incurred by the taxpayer, up to $2,500 per child or dependent; provided, however, that the credit allowed by this subsection shall not exceed a total of $7,500 per taxpayer in a taxable year. b.    A taxpayer shall be allowed an additional $1,000 credit per child provided that the qualified homeschooling expenses incurred by the taxpayer are for a child or dependent with special needs; provided, however, that the credit allowed by subsection a. and this subsection shall not exceed a total of $10,500 per taxpayer in a taxable year. c.     As used in this section, qualified homeschool expenses means expenses for educational textbooks, workbooks, and teachers edition books; computer software whose primary purpose is for teaching or self-learning; rental fees for educational curriculum; and membership fees for libraries and academic institutions and organizations.  Qualified homeschool expenses shall also include materials used to set up a home school, including but not limited to computers, desks, boards; consumable school supplies, including but not limited to pencils, pens, paper; and internet provider fees. d.    In the case of married couples who file separately, each person shall be permitted to claim one-half of the credit allowed pursuant to subsections a. and b. of this section for qualified homeschool expenses jointly incurred in a taxable year. e.     A taxpayer who is not subject to tax in accordance with N.J.S.54A:2-4 for a taxable year may claim the credit using an application made available by the director.  The due date for a tax credit application submitted pursuant to this subsection shall coincide with the due date for annual gross income tax returns. f.     The order of priority of the application of the credit allowed pursuant to this section and any other credits allowed against the New Jersey gross income tax due pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. for a taxable year shall be as prescribed by the director. g.    The amount of the credit applied against the New Jersey gross income tax due pursuant to N.J.S.54A:1-1 et seq. shall not reduce the liability of a taxpayer under the New Jersey gross income tax to an amount less than zero. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after the January 1 next following the date of enactment.